sv: Blekmedelsformulering: Klor; Oxygen; Peroxid; Övrigt
fr: Formulation du produit blanchissant: Chlore; Oxygène; Peroxyde; Autre
de: Bleichmittelformulierung: Chlor; Sauerstoff; Peroxid; Sonstiges
ru: Формула отбеливателя: Хлор; Кислород; Пероксидный; Другой
sl-SI: Formulacija belila: Klor; Oxygen; Peroksid; Druga
vi: Công thức thuốc tẩy: Clo; Oxy; Peroxide; Khác
ja: 漂白剤の配合: 塩素; 酸素系; 過酸化水素; その他
nl: Bleekmiddelformulering: Chloor; Zuurstof; Peroxide; Overig
en: Bleach formulation: Chlorine; Oxygen; Peroxide; Other
ro-RO: Formula înălbitorului: Clor; Oxygen; Peroxid; Altele
hr-HR: Formulacija izbjeljivača: Klor; Kisik; Peroksid; Ostalo
tr: Çamaşır suyu formülasyonu: Klor; Oksijen; Peroksit; Diğer
it: Formulazione sbiancante: Cloro; Ossigeno; Perossido; Altro
el: Σύνθεση λευκαντικού: Χλώριο; Οξυγόνο; Υπεροξείδιο; Άλλο
es: Formulación del blanqueador: Cloro; Oxígeno; Peróxido; Otros
hu: Fehérítő készítmény: Klór; Oxigén; Peroxid; Egyéb
ko: 표백제 제형: 염소계; 산소계; 과산화물; 기타
da: Blegemiddels sammensætning: Klor; Oxygen; Peroxid; Andet
pl: Formuła wybielacza: Chlor; Tlenowy; Nadtlenkowy; Pozostałe
fi: Valkaisuainekoostumus: Kloori; Happivalkaisuaine; Peroksidi; Muu
th: สูตรน้ำยาฟอกขาว: คลอรีน; ออกซิเจน; เปอร์ออกไซด์; อื่นๆ
nb: Blekemiddelformulering: Klor; Oxygen; Peroksid; Annet
lt-LT: Baliklio formulė: Chloras; Deguonis; Peroksidas; Kita
cs: Složení bělidla: Chlór; Kyslík; Peroxid; Jiné
pt-BR: Fórmula do alvejante: Cloro; Oxigênio; Peróxido; Outro
pt-PT: Fórmula do branqueador: Cloro; Oxigénio; Peróxido; Outro
sk-SK: Zloženie bielidla: Chlór; Oxygen (kyslík); Peroxid; Iné
zh-CN: 漂白剂配方: 氯基; 氧基; 过氧化物; 其他
bg-BG: Формула на белина: Хлор; Кислород; Пероксид; Друго
zh-TW: 漂白劑配方: 氯; 氧氣; 過氧化物; 其他